North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 26. Inspection of Ice Cream Plants, Creameries, and Cheese Factories.

§ 106-246.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-265, s. 13, effective July 17, 2013.

History.

1921, c. 169, s. 1; C.S., s. 7251(a); 1933, c. 431, s. 1; 1959, c. 707, s. 1; repealed by 2013-265, s. 13, effective July 17, 2013.

§ 106-247.
Cleaning and sterilization of vessels and utensils.

Suitable means or appliances shall be provided for the proper cleaning or sterilizing of freezers, vats, mixing cans or tanks, conveyors, and all utensils, tools and implements used in making or handling cream, ice cream, butter or cheese and all such apparatus shall be thoroughly cleaned as promptly after use as practicable.

History.

1921, c. 169, s. 2; C.S., s. 7251(b).

§ 106-248.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-265, s. 14, effective July 17, 2013.

History.

1921, c. 169, s. 3; C.S., s. 7251(c); 1933, c. 431, s. 2; 1959, c. 707, s. 2; repealed by 2013-265, s. 14, effective July 17, 2013.

§ 106-249.
Receivers of products to clean utensils before return.

Every person, company, or corporation who shall receive milk, cream, or ice cream which is delivered in cans, bottles, or other receptacles, shall thoroughly clean same as soon as practicable after the contents are removed and before the said receptacles are returned to shipper or person from whom the same was received or before such receptacles are delivered to any carrier to be returned to shipper.

History.

1921, c. 169, s. 4; C.S., s. 7251(d).

§ 106-250.
Correct tests of butterfat; tests by Board of Agriculture.

Creameries and factories that purchase milk and cream from producers of same on a butterfat basis, and pay for same on their own test, shall make and pay on correct test, and any failure to do so shall constitute a violation of this Article. The Board of Agriculture, under regulations provided for in

G.S. 106-253

, shall have such test made of milk and cream sold to factories named herein that will show if dishonest tests and practices are used by the purchasers of such products.

History.

1921, c. 169, s. 5; C.S., s. 7251(e).

§ 106-251.
Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services to enforce law; examinations.

It shall be the duty of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services to enforce this Article, and the Board of Agriculture shall cause to be made by the experts of the Department such examinations of plants and products named herein as are necessary to insure the compliance with the provisions of this Article. For the purpose of inspection, the authorized experts of the Department shall have authority, during business hours, to enter all plants or storage rooms where cream, ice cream, butter, or cheese or ingredients used in the same are made, stored, or kept, and any person who shall hinder, prevent, or attempt to prevent any duly authorized expert of the Department in the performance of his duty in connection with this Article shall be guilty of a violation of this Article.

History.

1921, c. 169, s. 6; C.S., s. 7251(f); 1997-261, s. 44.

§ 106-252.
Closure of plants for violation of Article; certificate to district attorney of district.

If it shall appear from the examinations that any provision of this Article has been violated, the Commissioner of Agriculture shall have authority to order the plant or place of manufacture closed until the law is complied with. If the owner or operator of the place refuses or fails to comply with the order, law or regulations, the Commissioner shall then certify the facts in the case to the district attorney in the district in which the violation was committed.

History.

1921, c. 169, s. 7; C.S., s. 7251(g); 1973, c. 47, s. 2.

§ 106-253.
Standards of purity and sanitation; regulating trade or brand names of frozen or semifrozen desserts.

The Board of Agriculture is authorized to make such definitions and to establish such standards of purity for products and sanitation for plants or places of manufacture named herein with such regulations, not in conflict with this Article, as shall be necessary to make provisions of this Article effective and insure the proper enforcement of same, and the violation of said standards of purity or regulations shall be deemed to be a violation of this Article. The Board is authorized to require the posting of inspection certificates. It shall be unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to use the words “cream,” “milk,” or “ice cream,” or either of them, or any similar sounding word or terms, as a part of or in connection with any product, trade name or brand of any frozen or semifrozen dessert manufactured, sold or offered for sale and not in fact made from dairy products under and in accordance with regulations, definitions or standards approved or promulgated by the Board of Agriculture.

History.

1921, c. 169, s. 8; C.S., s. 7251(h); 1933, c. 431, s. 3; 1945, c. 846; 1959, c. 707, s. 3; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1359, s. 1.

§ 106-254.
Inspection fees; wholesalers; retailers and cheese factories.

For the purpose of defraying the expenses incurred in the enforcement of this Article, the owner, proprietor or operator of each ice cream factory where ice cream, milk shakes, milk sherbet, sherbet, water ices, mixes for frozen or semifrozen desserts and other similar frozen or semifrozen food products are made or stored, or any cheese factory or butter-processing plant that disposes of its products at wholesale to retail dealers for resale in this State shall pay to the Commissioner of Agriculture each year an inspection fee of one hundred dollars ($100.00). Each maker of ice cream, milk shakes, milk sherbet, sherbet, water ices and/or other similar frozen or semifrozen food products who disposes of his product at retail only, and cheese factories, shall pay to the Commissioner of Agriculture an inspection fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) each year. The inspection fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) shall not apply to conventional spindle-type milk-shake mixers, but shall apply to milk-shake dispensing and vending machines, which operate on a continuous or automatic basis.

History.

1921, c. 169, s. 9; C.S., s. 7251(i); 1933, c. 431, s. 4; 1959, c. 707, s. 4; 1961, c. 791; 1989, c. 544, s. 15; 2015-241, s. 13.5(a); 2015-268, s. 5.2(a), (b).

§ 106-255.
Violation of Article a misdemeanor; punishment.

Any person, firm, or corporation who shall violate any of the provisions of this Article shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall only be fined not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for the first offense, and for each subsequent offense in the discretion of the court.

History.

1921, c. 169, s. 10; C.S., s. 7251(j); 1993, c. 539, s. 752; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).